Utah statutes.
67-19-30.   Grievance resolution -- Jurisdiction.

(1)  Employees shall comply with the procedural and jurisdictional requirements of this section, Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, and Chapter 19a, Grievance Procedures, in seeking resolution of grievances.

(2)  All grievances based upon a claim or charge of injustice or oppression, including dismissal from employment, resulting from an act, occurrence, commission, or condition shall be governed by Chapter 19a, Grievance Procedures, and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(3)  All grievances involving classification shall be governed by Section 67-19-31 and are designated as informal adjudicative proceedings as defined by Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(4)  All grievances by applicants for positions in state government involving an alleged discriminatory or prohibited employment practice shall be governed by Section 67-19-32 and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(5)  A "grievance" under this chapter is a request for agency action for purposes of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

